Maryland, session 2026, SB0787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–116.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0787*

SENATE BILL 787
(a) The Corporation may:
(1) acquire, improve, develop, manage, market, maintain, lease as lessor or
as lessee, and operate a project in the State;
(2) PARTICIPATE ON THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT TEAM FOR A
MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT, AS DEFINED IN §
3.5–301 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, BY WORKING WITH
THE DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, STATE AGENCIES, OR VENDORS
ON:
(I) DEFINING THE SCOPE OF THE MAJOR INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
(II) MANAGING THE BUDGET AND SCHEDULE FOR THE MAJOR
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
(III) IDENTIFYING AND MITIGATING RISKS;
(IV) PROVIDING TRANSPARENCY ON THE STATUS OF THE MAJOR
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT; AND
(V) SUCCESSFUL DELIVERY AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
(3) acquire, directly or through a person or governmental unit, by
purchase, gift, or devise, property, franchises, and other interests in land, including land
lying under water and riparian rights, located in or outside the State as necessary or
convenient to improve or operate a project, on terms and at prices that the Corporation
considers reasonable;
[(3)] (4) if approved by resolution by at least a two–thirds majority of the
legislative body of each governmental unit in which the property is located, acquire real
property or rights or easements in real property for a project by condemnation for public
use in accordance with applicable law; and
[(4)] (5) make loans to a person to:
(i) finance all or a part of the acquisition or improvement of a
project; and
(ii) refund outstanding bonds, mortgages, advances, loans, or other
obligations of the person to finance all or part of the acquisition or improvement of a project.

SENATE BILL 787 3
(b) The power of condemnation of the Corporation under subsection [(a)(3)]
(A)(4) of this section may not exceed the power of condemnation of the governmental unit
in which the property is located.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–301.
(k) (1) “Major information technology development project” means any
information technology development project that meets one or more of the following
criteria:
(i) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
estimated total cost of development equals or exceeds $5,000,000;
(ii) the project is undertaken to support a critical business function
associated with the public health, education, safety, or financial well–being of the residents
of Maryland; or
(iii) the Secretary determines that the project requires the special
attention and consideration given to a major information technology development project
due to:
1. the significance of the project’s potential benefits or risks;
2. the impact of the project on the public or local
governments;
3. the public visibility of the project; or
4. other reasons as determined by the Secretary.
(2) “Major information technology development project” does not include:
(i) technology that is reoccurring, standard operating technology as
determined by the Secretary and submitted to the Legislative Policy Committee for a
30–day review and comment period; or
(ii) a project with an estimated total cost of development that is:
1. less than $5,000,000 and is funded with money set aside
for expedited projects in the Fund; or
2. more than $5,000,000 and is funded with the money set
aside for expedited projects in the Fund if the Secretary determines that:

SENATE BILL 787
A. the unit of State government has sufficient
implementation resources, including human capital, subject matter expertise, and
technological infrastructure, or has the means to obtain these resources before project
initiation;
B. there is no sufficient alternative within the State’s
information technology inventory; and
C. the project will result in a comprehensive solution
designed to meet a cohesive set of business and technological objectives.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On a pilot basis, the Maryland Economic Development Corporation and the
Secretary of Information Technology shall identify a major information technology
development project, as defined in § 3.5–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
for which the Corporation will serve as the primary project manager on behalf of the unit
of State government as a demonstration project.
(b) On or before July 1, 2026, the Corporation shall report to the General
Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the
identification of the project, including appropriate details about the project.
(c) On or before October 1, 2026, and quarterly thereafter until project
completion, the Corporation shall report to the Secretary of Information Technology and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the
progress of the identified project, including:
(1) a summary of any problems or issues with the demonstration project
that the Corporation identifies;
(2) a review of the initial information technology project request and
whether the estimates made are reasonable, supported, and in alignment with the status
of the project;
(3) documentation of changes to project scope, schedule, or costs, and the
justification for and reasonableness of those changes;
(4) documentation of the qualifications of the employees and vendors; and
(5) identification of potential problems that may develop with the project.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Economic Development Corporation shall evaluate the
feasibility of using alternative financing mechanisms for major information technology
development projects, as defined in § 3.5–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.

SENATE BILL 787 5
(b) The evaluation required under subsection (a) of this section shall include
funding mechanisms used in other states that could be used in Maryland.
(c) On or before December 1, 2026, the Corporation shall submit a report to the
Secretary of Information Technology and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly that summarizes the work of the Corporation
in conducting the evaluation and any recommendations for financing major information
technology development projects in the State.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.